Maine, session 132, LD876.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
Maine Service Fellows Program Z417
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for 3 program fellows to participate in the Maine
Service Fellows Program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $90,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $90,000
Page 1 - 132LR1343(05)